Maine, session 132, LD1357.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §13011, sub-§6-C is enacted to read:
6-C. Additional pathways for industrial arts certification; conditional certificate;
endorsement. The state board shall adopt rules relating to the credentialing of educational
personnel to create a pathway for a teacher to obtain a conditional certificate and a pathway
for a teacher to obtain an endorsement on a teaching certificate for a component of
industrial arts as defined by the department with an experiential laboratory that includes,
but is not limited to, automotive body repair, diagnostics and mechanics; welding;
electrical; carpentry; and computer-aided design. An endorsement under this subsection
must be separate from other endorsements. At a minimum, rules adopted pursuant to this
subsection to obtain a conditional certificate must include the following qualifications:
A. A completed apprenticeship registered with a statewide or national apprenticeship
and training organization;
B. A completed 2-year degree or certificate from a technical institution accredited by
a national association of career and technical schools or similar organization; and
C. Completion of a minimum of 36 months of paid work experience or teaching
experience in a career and technical endorsement area, of which a minimum of 12
months was:
(1) At a supervisory level; and
(2) Completed during the 5 years immediately preceding application for a
conditional certificate or endorsement under this subsection.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are major substantive rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.